test/src/morphology/N-paeaeginzh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pǟgiņž: # Noun 231 'eng /est paljus/fin' - full paradigm
     pǟgiņž+N+Sg+Nom: pǟgiņž
     pǟgiņž+N+Sg+Gen: pǟgiņ
     pǟgiņž+N+Sg+Par: pǟgiņžt
     pǟgiņž+N+Sg+Dat: pǟgiņõn
     pǟgiņž+N+Sg+Ins: pǟgiņõks
     pǟgiņž+N+Sg+Ill: pǟgiņõ
     pǟgiņž+N+Sg+Ela: pǟgiņšt
     pǟgiņž+N+Pl+Nom: pǟgiņd
     pǟgiņž+N+Pl+Gen: pǟgiņd
     pǟgiņž+N+Pl+Par: pǟgiņi
     pǟgiņž+N+Pl+Dat: pǟgiņdõn
     pǟgiņž+N+Pl+Ins: pǟgiņdõks
     pǟgiņž+N+Pl+Ill: pǟgiņiž
     pǟgiņž+N+Pl+Ela: pǟgiņist
